Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 16 Coroners

Cross references.

Disposition of dead bodies, disturbing of graves, T. 31, C. 21.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, which affected various Code sections throughout this chapter, specifically provided (in § 11 of the Act) for the repeal of House Bill 255, which passed during the 1985 session and contained provisions affecting various Code sections in this chapter. House Bill 255 was also vetoed by the Governor on April 4, 1985 (Veto # 1).

By resolution (Ga. L. 1982, p. 1345), the General Assembly designated the “Georgia Coroners Manual” as the official operating manual for coroners in the State of Georgia, authorized and directed all coroners in the state to follow the instructions, procedures, and techniques detailed in the manual, and instructed the Secretary of the Senate to forward a copy of the resolution to each coroner in the state.